Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-305
Absence of judge; adjournment from day to day.

If the judge does not appear on the day appointed for holding the court, the clerk shall make an entry thereof in his record and adjourn the court until the next day, and so on until the fourth day, unless the judge appears.

Laws 1879, § 29, p. 88;

R.S.1913, § 1164;

C.S.1922, § 1087;

C.S.1929, § 27-305;

R.S.1943, § 24-305.